Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-751
Money
collected; disposition.

(1) All fees, charges, and costs
collected by the department pursuant to the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund.

(2) The department
shall remit fines collected under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act to
the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 32;

Laws 1995, LB 163, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 51;

R.S.Supp.,2008, § 45-716;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 36.